Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-17,109
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nursing Faculty Student Loan Act:

(1) Approved nursing program means a program offered by a public or private postsecondary educational institution in Nebraska (a) which consists of courses of instruction in regularly scheduled classes leading to a master of science degree, a bachelor of science degree, an associate degree, or a diploma in nursing or (b) for the preparation for licensure as a licensed practical nurse available to regularly enrolled undergraduate or graduate students;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(3) Masters or doctoral accredited nursing program means a postgraduate nursing education program that has been accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency and offered by a public or private postsecondary educational institution in Nebraska.

Laws 2005, LB 146, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 491.